Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Operation of Vehicles Generally
§ 31-5-234.
Unlawful operation of vehicle by youthful driver with detectable alcohol concentration; penalty.

As used in this section:

“Alcohol concentration” means:

The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred (100) milliliters of blood;

The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten (210) liters of breath; or

The number of grams of alcohol per seventy-five (75) milliliters of urine.

“Driver’s license” means as defined by W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxv) and includes nonresident operating privileges as defined by W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxx);

“Peace officer” means as defined by W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(A), (B) and (G);

“Conviction” means as defined by W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xi).

A person younger than twenty-one (21) years of age shall not operate or be in actual physical control of a vehicle in this state with an alcohol concentration of two one-hundredths of one percent (0.02%) or more nor operate or be in actual physical control of a vehicle in this state with an alcohol concentration of two one-hundredths of one percent (0.02%) or more as measured within two (2) hours after the time of driving or being in actual physical control following a lawful arrest resulting from a valid traffic stop.

Repealed by Laws 2002, ch. 93, § 2.

When a peace officer has probable cause to believe that a person may be violating or has violated subsection (b) of this section, the peace officer may require that the person submit to a chemical test or tests to be administered in compliance with W.S.

31-6-108

. Prosecution for a violation of this section is a bar to prosecution under W.S. 12-6-101(b) or any similar municipal ordinance.

A person convicted of violating this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00). A person convicted of violating this section a second time within one (1) year of the first conviction is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) month, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both. A person convicted of a third or subsequent conviction under this section within two (2) years shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both. The court may order the person to undergo a substance abuse assessment and complete any recommended treatment for any conviction under this section as a condition of probation. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the term of probation imposed by a judge under this section may exceed the maximum term of imprisonment established for the offense under this subsection provided the term of probation together with any extension thereof, shall in no case exceed three (3) years.

A person convicted under this section or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence as defined in W.S.

31-5-233

(a)(v) shall, in addition to the penalty imposed in subsection (e) of this section:

Have his driver’s license denied or suspended pursuant to W.S. 31-7-128(h). The court shall forward a copy of the conviction to the department;

For a first conviction where the department’s administrative action indicates the person had an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent (0.15%) or more, operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device, pursuant to W.S.

31-7-401

through

31-7-404

, for a period of six (6) months. For purposes of this paragraph, the department’s administrative action shall be deemed to indicate a person had an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent (0.15%) or more only after the person is notified of and given the opportunity to pursue the administrative procedures provided by W.S.

31-7-105

;

For a second conviction, operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device, pursuant to W.S.

31-7-401

through

31-7-404

, for a period of one (1) year;

For a third conviction, operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device, pursuant to W.S. 31-7-401 through 31-7-404, for a period of two (2) years;

For a fourth or subsequent conviction, operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device, pursuant to W.S. 31-7-401 through 31-7-404, for the remainder of the offender’s life, except five (5) years from the date of conviction and every five (5) years thereafter, the offender may apply to the court for removal of the ignition interlock device required by this paragraph. The court may, for good cause shown, remove the ignition interlock device requirement if the offender has not been subsequently convicted of driving a motor vehicle in violation of this section, W.S.

31-5-233

or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence as defined in W.S. 31-5-233(a)(v).

The court may, upon pronouncement of any jail sentence under subsection (e) of this section, provide in the sentence that the defendant may be permitted, if he is employed or enrolled in school and can continue his employment or education, to continue such employment or education for not more than the time necessary as certified by his employer or school administrator, and the remaining day, days or parts of days shall be spent in jail until the sentence is served. He shall be allowed out of jail only long enough to complete his actual hours of employment or education and a reasonable time to travel to and from his place of employment or school. Unless the defendant is indigent, the court shall require him as a condition of special treatment under this subsection to pay a reasonable amount for room and board as determined by the sheriff.

Chemical analysis of a person’s blood, breath or urine to determine alcohol concentration or controlled substance content shall be performed in accordance with W.S. 31-6-105(a).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 102, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 202, § 1; 2009, ch. 160, § 1; 2010, ch. 5, § 1; 2011, ch. 39, § 1; ch. 178, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (f), substituted “other law prohibiting driving while under the influence as defined in W.S. 31-5-233(a)(v)” for “a municipal ordinance which substantially conforms to the provisions of this section”; designated the existing provisions beginning with “Have his driver’s license denied” as (f)(i); and added (f)(ii) through (f)(v).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “nor operate or be in actual physical control of a vehicle in this state with an alcohol concentration of two one-hundredths of one percent (0.02%) or more as measured within two (2) hours after the time of driving or being in actual physical control following a lawful arrest resulting from a valid traffic stop” in (b).

The 2011 amendments. —

The first amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 39, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in (f)(ii), substituted “department's administrative action indicates the person had” for “conviction is based on the person having,” deleted “from the date of conviction” at the end of the first sentence, and added the second sentence;
and deleted “from the date of conviction” at the end of (f)(iii) and (f)(iv).

The second amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in (d), substituted “require” for “request.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Cited

in

Wyoming DOT v. Haglund, 982 P.2d 699,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 31-5-235.
Consumption and possession of alcoholic beverages in opened containers by operator of vehicle prohibited; definitions; penalty.

As used in this section;

“Alcoholic beverage” means alcoholic liquor or malt beverage as defined in W.S. 12-1-101(a)(i), (vii) and (x);

“Recreational vehicle” means a self-propelled motor vehicle designed primarily with living quarters for recreational, camping, vacation or travel use but excludes any vehicle that does not have plumbing and an electrical system that operates above twelve (12) volts.

No person shall consume, transport or possess any alcoholic beverage in a motor vehicle while the motor vehicle is in motion on a public street or public highway unless the beverage is:

In the original unopened package or container, the seal of which has not been broken and from which the original cap, cork or other means of closure has not been removed. Notwithstanding this section, a resealed bottle of wine may be transported as provided in W.S. 12-4-410(e);

In the trunk or any other outside compartment of the vehicle that is not readily accessible to any person in the vehicle while the vehicle is in motion;

In the unoccupied back of a pickup truck out of reach of the driver even though access is available through a window;

In an unoccupied rear compartment of a vehicle not equipped with a trunk or other outside compartment and the rear compartment is not readily accessible to the driver and not normally occupied by passengers while the vehicle is in motion; or

Secured in a cabinet or compartment of a recreational vehicle, and the cabinet or compartment is not readily accessible to the driver while the recreational vehicle is in motion. The alcoholic beverage shall remain secured and shall not be accessed by the driver or any passenger at any time the vehicle is in motion.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall:

For a first conviction or a subsequent conviction not occurring within one (1) year after the first conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200.00);

For a second conviction within one (1) year after the first conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than three hundred dollars ($300.00) or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both;

For a third or subsequent conviction within one (1) year after the first conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

This section shall not apply to any passenger in the passenger area of a motor vehicle designed, maintained or used primarily for the transportation of passengers for compensation. The driver of any vehicle under this subsection is prohibited from consuming or having an alcoholic beverage within the driver’s zone of control.

This section shall not apply within the boundaries of any incorporated municipality that has adopted an ordinance prohibiting transportation or possession of any open container of an alcoholic beverage in a vehicle on a public street or public highway.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 149, § 1; 2005, ch. 92, § 1; 2007, ch. 138, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the last sentence in (b).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) added (a)(ii) and designated remaining paragraphs accordingly; in (b) inserted “, transport” following “No person shall consume”, substituted “in” for “while operating”, inserted “while the motor vehicle is in motion” and inserted (b)(i) designation and designated remaining paragraphs accordingly; added (d) and (e).

Cited

in

Hittner v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT (In re Hittner), 2008 WY 91, 189 P.3d 872,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Aug. 1, 2008).

§ 31-5-236.
Careless driving.

Any person who drives any vehicle in a manner inconsistent with the exercise of due and diligent care normally exercised by a reasonably prudent person under similar circumstances and where such operation of a motor vehicle creates an unreasonable risk of harm to other persons or property is guilty of careless driving.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 69, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 69, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 31-5-237.
Use of handheld electronic wireless communication devices for electronic messaging prohibited; exceptions; penalties.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle on a public street or highway while using a handheld electronic wireless communication device to write, send or read a text-based communication. This section shall not apply to a person who is using a handheld electronic wireless communication device:

While the vehicle is lawfully parked;

To contact an emergency response vehicle;

To write, read, select or enter a telephone number or name in an electronic wireless communications device for the purpose of making or receiving a telephone call; or

When using voice operated or hands free technology.

This section shall not apply to a person operating an emergency response vehicle while making communications necessary to the performance of his official duties as an emergency responder.

Any person who operates a motor vehicle in violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seventy-five dollars ($75.00).

As used in this section:

“Electronic wireless communication device” means a mobile communication device that uses short-wave analog or digital radio transmissions or satellite transmissions between the device and a transmitter to permit wireless telephone communications to and from the user of the device within a specified area;

“Emergency response vehicle” means any ambulance, fire department, law enforcement or civil defense vehicle or other vehicle used primarily for emergency purposes;

“Voice operated or hands free technology” means technology that allows a user to write, send or read a text based communication without the use of either hand except to activate, deactivate or initiate a feature or function;

“Write, send or read a text-based communication” means using an electronic wireless communications device to manually communicate with any person using text-based communication including, but not limited to, communications referred to as a text message, instant message or electronic mail.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 105, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 105, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.